en: Cream sauces with mushrooms
fr: Sauces aux champignons et à la crème
hr: Umaci od vrhnja s gljivama
lt: Kreminiai padažai su grybais
nl: Champignonsauzen

en: Basque-style sauces, Tomato sauces with sweet peppers
fr: Sauces basquaises, Sauce basquaise, Sauces aux poivrons, Sauce aux poivrons

en: American-style sauces
fr: Sauces américaine
hr: Umaci na američki način
lt: Amerikietiško stiliaus padažai
pl: Sosy amerykańskie, Sos amerykański, Sosy w stylu amerykańskim
zh: 美式酱料

en: White butter sauces
fr: Sauces au beurre blanc, Sauces beurre blanc, Sauce au beurre blanc
hr: Umaci s bijelim maslacem
lt: Baltojo sviesto padažai

en: Butter sauces
fr: Sauces au beurre
hr: Umaci od maslaca
lt: Sviesto padažai
nl: Botersauzen

en: Roux
fr: Roux, Roux blancs

en: Brown roux
fr: Roux bruns

en: Burgundy-style sauces
fr: Sauces bourguignonnes, Sauce bourguignonne
hr: Umaci u burgundskom stilu
lt: Burgundiško stiliaus padažai

en: Cream sauce with shallots
fr: Sauce à l'échalote à la crème

en: Cream sauces
fi: Kermakastike
fr: Sauces à la crème
hr: Umaci od vrhnja
lt: Kreminiai padažai

en: Mushroom sauces, Mushroom sauce
ca: Salsa de bolets, salsa de boletus, salsa boletus
de: Pilzsaucen
es: Salsa de setas, salsa de seta, salsa de boletos, salsa boletus
fi: sienikastikkeet
fr: Sauces aux champignons, Sauces champignons, Sauces champignons archiduc, Sauce aux champignons
hr: Umaci od gljiva
ja: マッシュルームソース
lt: Grybų padažai, padažai su grybais
nl: Paddenstoelsauzen, Paddenstoelsaus
pl: Sosy grzybowe, Sos grzybowy

en: Hunter-style sauces, Garnish of mushrooms shallots and tomatoes in white wine sauce
fr: Sauces chasseur, Sauce chasseur

en: Cocktail sauces
de: Cocktailsaucen
fr: Sauces cocktail
hr: Koktel umaci
it: Salse cocktail
lt: Kokteiliniai padažai

en: Hollandaise sauce
de: Sauce Hollandaise
fr: Sauces hollandaise, Sauce hollandaise
hr: Holandski umak
ja: オランデーズソース
pl: Sosy holenderskie, Sos holenderski

en: Piccalillis, Piccalilli
fr: Piccalillis, Sauces piccalilli, piccalilli
nl: Piccalilli

en: Salad dressings, Dressings, Salad sauce
an: Apanyo
ar: صلصة سلطة
bg: Салатен сос, Дресинг
bn: সালাদ ড্রেসিং
ca: Amaniments, Salses per amanides
cs: Dresink
cy: Dresin salad
da: Salatdressinger, Dressinger
de: Salatsoßen, Salatsoße, Salatsaucen, Salatsauce
eo: Salatosaŭcoj
es: Aderezos para ensaladas, Aliño
et: Salatikaste
fa: سس سالاد
fi: Salaattikastikkeet, Salaattikastike
fr: Sauces salades, sauce salade, sauce pour salade
he: תיבול לסלט
hr: Preljevi za salatu
hy: Աղցանային ամոքունք
is: Dressing
it: Condimenti per insalate
ja: サラダドレッシング
ko: 샐러드 드레싱
ku: Sosa seletê
lt: Salotų padažai
mk: Салатен прелив
ml: സാലഡ് ഡ്രസ്സിംഗ്
nb: Salatdressinger, Dressinger
nl: Slasauzen, Sladressings, Saladedressing
nn: Salatdressingar, Dressingar
pa: ਸਲਾਦ ਸੌਸ
ru: Заправки для салатов, Салатная заправка
sl: Solatni preliv
sq: Salcë sallate
sv: Salladsdressingar, Dressingar, Salladssåser
uk: Салатна заправка
uz: Salat ziravorlari
zh: 沙拉醬

en: Salad dressings with reduced fat, Salad dressing with reduced fat, Low fat salad dressing, Light salad dressing
da: Lette salatdressinger
fr: Sauces crudités allégées, Sauces crudités light, Sauce crudités allégée en matière grasse, Sauce salade allégée en matière grasse
hr: Preljev za salatu sa smanjenom masnoćom
lt: Salotų padažai su sumažintu riebalų kiekiu
sv: Lätta salladsdressingar

en: Rhode Island dressings
da: Rhode Island-dressinger
sv: Rhode Island-dressingar, Rhode Island-såser

en: Rhode Island dressings with reduced fat, Light Rhode Island dressings
sv: Lätta Rhode Island-dressingar, Rhode Island lätt dressing

en: Caesar salad dressings, Caesar dressings, Caesar sauces, Caesar style salad dressings
da: Cæsardressinger, Caesardressinger
fr: Sauces caesar, sauces césar
hr: Cezar umaci
it: Salse caesar, salsa caesar
lt: Cezario padažai
sv: Caesardressingar